Wyoming, session 2025, HB0182.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-1-102(a)(xxx)(A) is amended to
read:

22-1-102. Definitions.

HB0182

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0585
(a) The definitions contained in this chapter apply
to words and phrases used in this Election Code and govern
the construction of those words and phrases unless they are
specifically modified by the context in which they appear.
As used in this Election Code:

(xxx) "Residence" is the place of a person's
actual habitation. The construction of this term shall be
governed by the following rules:

(A) Residence is the place where a person
has a current habitation and to which, whenever he is
absent, he has the intention of returning, provided it is
not a secondary, commercial or other address which the
person does not use for the purpose of habitation;

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0182